Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Subchapter 3. Service by Authorized Persons

§ 731.
Indifferent person, appointment of.

When a summons, writ, or other process is not specially required by law to be served by an officer, any Superior judge, or any judge of the court to which the process is returnable, may appoint an indifferent person to serve the process if it appears that service by that person will be more economical or efficient than service by an officer.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 37, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 732.
Power of specially appointed person.

The person so appointed shall have the power of a sheriff in the service and return of the process, and he or she shall make proof of the service by affidavit.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 38, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 733.
Fees.

When the service of any process is made for a party by a person specially appointed for that purpose, fees for the service shall not be recoverable of or taxed against the opposite party in excess of one-half of the taxable fees of a proper officer, had the process been served by that officer.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 39, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 734.
Property taken from specially appointed person by officer.

When property is attached or taken in execution by a person specially appointed, it may be taken by an officer having an attachment or execution against it from the possession of the specially appointed person or his or her receiptor, but subject to the lien created by the previous attachment or taking in execution.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 40, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 735.
Delivery of writ; return; completion of service.

When property is taken as outlined in section 734 of this title, the person specially appointed shall deliver to the officer the writ of attachment or execution upon which he or she took the property, with a return of his or her action thereon, unless the writ has been returned to the attorney or court signing the writ.
The officer shall complete the service thereof.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 41, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 736.
Officer’s duties and liabilities.

When property is taken by an officer from the possession of a specially appointed person or his or her receiptor, the officer shall be subject to the duties and liabilities relating to the property and arising by virtue of the previous attachment or taking in execution and shall be responsible for the property to the plaintiff or creditor having the prior lien thereon by virtue of the attachment, as the specially appointed person or his or her receiptor would have been if the property had not been taken from his or her possession.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 42, eff. March 29, 1972.